ext/spell/ar.aff
FLAG	long
PFX	Ft	Y	6
PFX	Ft	0	فلي/X0	أ
PFX	Ft	و	فلي/X0	و[^أئ]
PFX	Ft	وأ	فليئ/X0	و[أ]
PFX	Ft	وئ	فليوأ/X0	و[ئ]
PFX	Ft	آ	فليئ/X0	آ
PFX	Ft	0	فلي/X0	[^وأ]

############سوابق#الماضي####################

PFX	Ha	Y	9
PFX	Ha	0	0	.
PFX	Ha	ا	أ	ا
PFX	Ha	0	أ	[^ا]
PFX	Ha	0	و	.
PFX	Ha	0	أو	.
PFX	Ha	0	ف	.
PFX	Ha	0	أف	.
PFX	Ha	0	ل	.
PFX	Ha	0	ول	.

PFX	Hb	Y	80
PFX	Hb	آ	أو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	أأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	وأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	أوأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	فأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	أفأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	لأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	آ	ولأو/X0	آ
PFX	Hb	تأ	تؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	أتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	وتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	أوتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	فتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	أفتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	لتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تأ	ولتؤ/X0	تأ
PFX	Hb	تآ	تؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	أتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	وتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	أوتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	فتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	أفتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	لتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	تآ	ولتؤو/X0	تآ
PFX	Hb	استأ	استؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	أستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	واستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	أواستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	فاستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	أفاستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	لاستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استأ	ولاستؤ/X0	است[أ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	استئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	أستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	واستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	أواستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	فاستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	أفاستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	لاستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	استآ	ولاستئ/X0	است[آ]
PFX	Hb	ائ	اؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	أؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	واؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	أواؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	فاؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	أفاؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	لاؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	ائ	ولاؤ/X0	ائ
PFX	Hb	أي	أو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	أأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	وأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	أوأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	فأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	أفأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	لأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أي	ولأو/X0	أي[^أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	أيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	أأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	وأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	أوأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	فأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	أفأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	لأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	أيأ	ولأيئ/X0	أي[أ]
PFX	Hb	وأ	وئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	أوئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	ووئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	أووئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	فوئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	أفوئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	لوئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	وأ	ولوئ/X0	وأ
PFX	Hb	0	0/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	أ/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	و/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	أو/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	ف/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	أف/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	ل/X0	[^آأاوت]
PFX	Hb	0	ول/X0	[^آأاوت]

PFX	Hc	Y	24
PFX	Hc	آ	إ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	أإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	وإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	أوإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	فإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	أفإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	لإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	آ	ولإ/X0	آ
PFX	Hc	استأ	استئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	أستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	واستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	أواستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	فاستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	أفاستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	لاستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	استأ	ولاستئ/X0	استأ
PFX	Hc	0	0/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	أ/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	و/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	أو/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	ف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	أف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	ل/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hc	0	ول/X0	[^اآ]

PFX	Hd	Y	24
PFX	Hd	آ	أ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	أأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	وأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	أوأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	فأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	أفأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	لأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	آ	ولأ/X0	آ
PFX	Hd	استآ	استأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	أستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	واستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	أواستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	فاستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	أفاستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	لاستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	استآ	ولاستأ/X0	استآ
PFX	Hd	0	0/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	أ/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	و/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	أو/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	ف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	أف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	ل/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	Hd	0	ول/X0	[^اآ]

PFX	He	Y	24
PFX	He	آ	إي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	أإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	وإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	أوإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	فإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	أفإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	لإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	آ	ولإي/X0	آ
PFX	He	استآ	استئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	أستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	واستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	أواستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	فاستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	أفاستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	لاستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	استآ	ولاستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	He	0	0/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	أ/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	و/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	أو/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	ف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	أف/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	ل/X0	[^اآ]
PFX	He	0	ول/X0	[^اآ]

############سوابق#الأمر####################

PFX	Ja	Y	3
PFX	Ja	0	0/X0	.
PFX	Ja	0	و/X0	.
PFX	Ja	0	ف/X0	.

PFX	Jb	Y	33
PFX	Jb	أ	0/X0	أ[^و]
PFX	Jb	أ	و/X0	أ[^و]
PFX	Jb	أ	ف/X0	أ[^و]
PFX	Jb	آ	إ/X0	آ
PFX	Jb	آ	وإ/X0	آ
PFX	Jb	آ	فإ/X0	آ
PFX	Jb	و	0/X0	و[^ئ]
PFX	Jb	و	و/X0	و[^ئ]
PFX	Jb	و	ف/X0	و[^ئ]
PFX	Jb	ائ	اي/X0	ا[ئ]
PFX	Jb	ائ	وائ/X0	ا[ئ]
PFX	Jb	ائ	فائ/X0	ا[ئ]
PFX	Jb	أيأ	أيئ/X0	أ[يأ]
PFX	Jb	أيأ	وأيئ/X0	أ[يأ]
PFX	Jb	أيأ	فأيئ/X0	أ[يأ]
PFX	Jb	استأ	استئ/X0	ا[ستأ]
PFX	Jb	استأ	واستئ/X0	ا[ستأ]
PFX	Jb	استأ	فاستئ/X0	ا[ستأ]
PFX	Jb	استآ	استئ/X0	ا[ستآ]
PFX	Jb	استآ	واستئ/X0	ا[ستآ]
PFX	Jb	استآ	فاستئ/X0	ا[ستآ]
PFX	Jb	أو	إ/X0	أ[و]
PFX	Jb	أو	وإ/X0	أ[و]
PFX	Jb	أو	فإ/X0	أ[و]
PFX	Jb	وئ	ايأ/X0	و[ئ]
PFX	Jb	وئ	وايأ/X0	و[ئ]
PFX	Jb	وئ	فايأ/X0	و[ئ]
PFX	Jb	وأ	إ/X0	و[أ]
PFX	Jb	وأ	وإ/X0	و[أ]
PFX	Jb	وأ	فإ/X0	و[أ]
PFX	Jb	0	ا/X0	[^وأاآ]
PFX	Jb	0	وا/X0	[^وأاآ]
PFX	Jb	0	فا/X0	[^وأاآ]

PFX	Jc	Y	12
PFX	Jc	أ	اي/X0	أ
PFX	Jc	أ	وائ/X0	أ
PFX	Jc	أ	فائ/X0	أ
PFX	Jc	آ	أ/X0	آ
PFX	Jc	آ	وأ/X0	آ
PFX	Jc	آ	فأ/X0	آ
PFX	Jc	و	اي/X0	و
PFX	Jc	و	واي/X0	و
PFX	Jc	و	فاي/X0	و
PFX	Jc	استآ	استئي/X0	استآ
PFX	Jc	استآ	واستئي/X0	استآ
PFX	Jc	استآ	فاستئي/X0	استآ

PFX	Jd	Y	9
PFX	Jd	أ	او/X0	أ
PFX	Jd	أ	واؤ/X0	أ
PFX	Jd	أ	فاؤ/X0	أ
PFX	Jd	آ	أو/X0	آ
PFX	Jd	آ	وأو/X0	آ
PFX	Jd	آ	فأو/X0	آ
PFX	Jd	و	او/X0	و
PFX	Jd	و	واو/X0	و
PFX	Jd	و	فاو/X0	و

PFX	Je	Y	9
PFX	Je	أ	إ/X0	أ
PFX	Je	أ	وإ/X0	أ
PFX	Je	أ	فإ/X0	أ
PFX	Je	آ	إي/X0	آ
PFX	Je	آ	وإي/X0	آ
PFX	Je	آ	فإي/X0	آ
PFX	Je	و	0/X0	و
PFX	Je	و	و/X0	و
PFX	Je	و	ف/X0	و

############لواحق#الأفعال####################

############لواحق#المضارع####################
############لواحق#المضارع-بدون-ضمير####################

#مجموعة-لواحق-المضارع-الأولى،-الصنف-الأول-SFX---01/06/01-=-a1-a2-a3-a4-a5-a6-a7-a8	

#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	a1	Y	75
SFX	a1	أ	أ/AaAeAiAmAqX0	أ
SFX	a1	ئ	أ/AaAeAiAmAqX0	ئ
SFX	a1	اء	وء/AaAeAiAmAqX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ئي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ؤو/AaAeAiAmAqX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	و/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	ي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	و/AaAeAiAmAqX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	ي/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	ى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	أى/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	اء	ؤ/AaAqX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ء/AaAqX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	أ/AaAqX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ء/AaAqX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ء/AaAqX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	0/AaAqX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	0/AaAqX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	0/AaAqX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	0/AaAqX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	0/AaAqX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	ء/AaAqX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	0	0/AaAeAiAmAqX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	a1	أ	أ/AbAfAjAnArX0	أ
SFX	a1	ئ	أ/AbAfAjAnArX0	ئ
SFX	a1	اء	وء/AbAfAjAnArX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ئي/AbAfAjAnArX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AbAfAjAnArX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ؤو/AbAfAjAnArX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	و/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	ي/AbAfAjAnArX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	و/AbAfAjAnArX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	ي/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	ى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	أى/AbAfAjAnArX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	اء	ؤ/AbArX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ء/AbArX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	أ/AbArX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ء/AbArX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ء/AbArX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	0/AbArX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	0/AbArX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	0/AbArX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	0/AbArX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	0/AbArX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	ء/AbArX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	0	0/AbAfAjAnArX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
SFX	a1	أ	أ/AcAgAkAoAsX0	أ
SFX	a1	ئ	أ/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ئ
SFX	a1	اء	وء/AcAgAkAoAsX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ئي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ئي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ؤو/AcAgAkAoAsX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	و/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	ي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	و/AcAgAkAoAsX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	ي/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	ى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	أى/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	اء	ؤ/AcAsX0	اء
SFX	a1	ءى	ء/AcAsX0	ءى
SFX	a1	أى	أ/AcAsX0	[ت]أى
SFX	a1	أى	ء/AcAsX0	[^ت]أى
SFX	a1	آ	ء/AcAsX0	آ
SFX	a1	ا	0/AcAsX0	[^ي]ا
SFX	a1	ا	0/AcAsX0	يا
SFX	a1	و	0/AcAsX0	و
SFX	a1	ى	0/AcAsX0	[^أء]ى
SFX	a1	ي	0/AcAsX0	[^ئ]ي
SFX	a1	ئي	ء/AcAsX0	[ئ]ي
SFX	a1	0	0/AcAgAkAoAsX0	[^أئءاآيوى]
#أنا-نحن-أنتَ
SFX	a?	Y	3
SFX	a?	0	0/AaAqX0	.
SFX	a?	0	0/AbArX0	.
SFX	a?	0	0/AcAsX0	.
